California, session 20252026, AB1008.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 23826.23 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:23826.23. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, in the County of San Luis Obispo, the department may issue no more than a total of 10 additional new original on-sale general licenses for bona fide public eating places. The department shall not issue more than five licenses under this section per year.(b) In issuing the licenses provided for in this section, the department shall follow the procedure set forth in Section 23961. (c) This chapter does not prohibit a person that currently holds a valid on-sale general license for seasonal business from applying for an original on-sale general license pursuant to this section.(d) (1) A license issued under this section shall not be transferred from one county to another, nor shall it be transferred to any premises not qualifying under this section.(2) A license issued under this section shall not be sold or transferred for a price greater than the original fee paid by the seller or transferor.(e) The department may designate licenses issued pursuant to this section as on-sale general for special use. This designation does not alter any license privileges or restrictions established by this section.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because even though population growth has remained steady, tourism in the County of San Luis Obispo has grown exponentially, and tourist demand is driving an increased demand for alcohol licenses.